Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB873.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Public Service Commission shall regulate utilities and enforce the provisions of
this chapter. The commission shall be a body corporate, with power to sue and be
sued in its corporate name. The commission may adopt a seal bearing the name
"Public Service Commission of Kentucky," which seal shall be affixed to all writs
and official documents, and to such other instruments as the commission directs,
and all courts shall take judicial note of the seal.
(2) The jurisdiction of the commission shall extend to all utilities in this state. The
commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of rates and
service of utilities, but with that exception nothing in this chapter is intended to
limit or restrict the police jurisdiction, contract rights, or powers of cities or
political subdivisions.
(3) The commission may promulgate[adopt], in accordance[keeping] with KRS
Chapter 13A, reasonable administrative regulations to implement the provisions of
KRS Chapter 278 and investigate the methods and practices of utilities to require
them to conform to the laws of this state, and to all reasonable rules, administrative
regulations, and orders of the commission not contrary to law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed